Hawaii statutes.
§651-40 Stay by judge; effect. Any
judge of a court of record may, by order at chambers, in any cause in which an
execution has been issued, grant a stay thereof in the officer's hands, for
equitable reasons, when no appeal or writ of error is granted, upon the
defendant giving bond and security for its payment with costs up to the stay.
The property levied upon shall not be released from the levy by the stay of
execution, and in case at the end of the time accorded the condition of the
bond be not complied with, the plaintiff in execution may elect whether to
proceed to the sale of the levied property, or to enforce the bond; provided
that if the levied property is not sufficient to pay the judgment, with all
costs, expenses, and commissions, the stay inclusive, the sureties in the bond
shall be answerable for the deficiency. And when justice may require the
renewal of any execution, or an extension of the time for making return to any
execution, any judge of a court of record shall have power so to order. [CC
1859, §1033; RL 1925, §2444; RL 1935, §4143; RL 1945, §10170; RL 1955, §233-39;
HRS §651-40]

Rules of Court

As to powers at chambers, see HRCP rule 77(b).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next